Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.90.030

Branch campuses exempt under chapter 28B.85 RCW.

A branch campus of a foreign degree-granting institution previously found by the council to be exempt from chapter 28B.85 RCW may continue to operate in the state. However, within one year of July 25, 1993, the institution shall provide evidence of authorization as required under RCW 28B.90.020. Upon receipt of the satisfactory evidence, the council shall certify that the branch campus of the foreign degree-granting institution is approved to operate in the state under this chapter.

[ 2012 c 229 s 556; 1993 c 181 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.